Florida, session 2026, SB1226.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 604.74, Florida Statutes, is created to 23 read: 24 604.74âRefrigerant safety and agricultural continuity.â 25 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âRefrigerant Safety 26 and Agricultural Continuity Act.â 27 (2)âThe Legislature finds that this stateâs agricultural 28 food processing and cold chain industries rely upon refrigerant 29 systems that ensure product safety, temperature stability, and 30 export reliability. The United States Environmental Protection 31 Agencyâs technology transition rule requires replacement of R 32 410A refrigerants with A2L refrigerants, including R-454B 33 refrigerants, beginning in calendar years 2025 and 2026. R-454B 34 refrigerant is classified as a mildly flammable refrigerant and 35 has not been fully tested or certified for all commercial and 36 agricultural refrigerant applications, creating potential risk 37 of fire, equipment failure, and insurance exclusion. A rapid 38 transition to A2L refrigerants may impose substantial costs on 39 this stateâs agricultural food processing and cold chain 40 industries with statewide economic impacts estimated in the 41 billions of dollars. It is in the public interest to protect 42 safety, food supply integrity, and small business continuity 43 during the refrigerant transition period. It is the intent of 44 the Legislature to ensure the safety, economic stability, and 45 operational continuity of this stateâs commercial and 46 agricultural food processing and cold chain industries by 47 authorizing the continued use of R-410A refrigerants until 48 alternative refrigerants, such as R-454B refrigerants, are 49 proven safe, fully certified, and supported by adequate 50 equipment availability, workforce training, and insurance 51 coverage. 52 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 53 (a)ââAgricultural refrigerant applicationâ means any 54 cooling or cold storage system used for commercial and 55 agricultural production or food processing, packaging, or 56 transport. 57 (b)ââA2L refrigerantâ means any refrigerant classified as 58 lower toxicity and mildly flammable under American Society of 59 Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers Standard 60 34. 61 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 62 Consumer Services. 63 (4)âNotwithstanding any federal phase-down schedule or 64 other conflicting law, this stateâs commercial and agricultural 65 food processing and cold chain industries may continue to 66 purchase, install, and service equipment utilizing R-410A 67 refrigerants through January 1, 2035, or as otherwise determined 68 by the Legislature. The department shall maintain records of R 69 410A equipment installations and coordinate with relevant 70 federal agencies to ensure compliance with applicable reporting 71 requirements. 72 (5)âBy January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 73 department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental 74 Protection and the State Fire Marshal, shall provide a report to 75 the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 76 Representatives on: 77 (a)âSafety performance data for A2L refrigerants, including 78 R-454B refrigerants. 79 (b)âAvailability of compliant equipment and certified 80 technicians for statewide transition to A2L refrigerants. 81 (c)âInsurance and liability standards applicable to A2L 82 refrigerant systems. 83 (d)âRecommendations regarding readiness for statewide 84 transition to A2L refrigerants. 85 (6)âA person or business entity operating in compliance 86 with this section and using R-410A refrigerants may not be held 87 liable solely for continued use of such refrigerants under any 88 federal phase-down schedule until a state-certified safe 89 alternative is fully available. 90 (7)âThe department may coordinate with Florida College 91 System institutions, career centers, and industry trade 92 associations to expand training and certification programs for 93 the safe handling, installation, and servicing of A2L 94 refrigerants. 95 (8)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 96 section. 97 (9)âThis section establishes the stateâs enforcement 98 discretion and safety timeline consistent with its interest in 99 agriculture and public safety and may not be construed to 100 preempt or contravene the authority of the United States 101 Environmental Protection Agency. 102 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.